California statutes. Public Utilities Code
Written protests or objections to the formation of the district or to its extent within the county may be filed in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors of any affected county at any time prior to the hour fixed for the hearing. At the hearing the board of supervisors shall consider only the protests or objections filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22202.

The board of supervisors of each affected county shall hold a public hearing to consider the objections or protests at the time fixed for the hearing. The hearing may be continued by order of the board of supervisors entered on its minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22203.

Each board of supervisors may overrule any protests or objections filed with it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22204.

The board of supervisors of each affected county may exclude any territory within the county that in its opinion will not be benefited by inclusion in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Election [22226. - 22232.]

22226.

If after the hearing the board of supervisors of each affected county determines that the district should be formed, each board, by resolution entered on its minutes, shall:

(a) Define and describe the boundaries of the district or otherwise designate its territorial extent.

(b) State the name of the district, which shall contain the words “____________________ airport district.”

(c) Call an election in the county, or portion thereof within the district, for the purpose of determining whether the district shall be formed and to elect a board of five directors for the district if formed.

(d) Fix the date of the election and the hours the polls will be open.

(e) Establish election precincts and designate polling places for the election.

(f) Appoint the election officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22227.

The resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in each county and city in the district. The first publication shall be at least 30 days prior to the date of the election. The resolution may be published in more than one newspaper by order of the board of supervisors of the affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

22228.

The proposition submitted at the election shall be “Shall the proposition to form ____________________ Airport District under the California Airport District Act be adopted?”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22229.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the election shall be called, noticed, and conducted, candidates nominated, the vote canvassed, and the results declared in the manner prescribed by law for general municipal elections in general law cities and by the general laws so far as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 643.)
-------------------------------------------

22229.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed.

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

22229.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

22229.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

22229.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The election officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 188.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

22230.

At the first election the board of supervisors of each affected county and its clerk have the powers and duties vested in the legislative bodies of cities and their clerks by the general laws described in Section 22229. Thereafter the board of directors of the district and its secretary have these powers and duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22231.

The canvass of the returns of the election shall be made at the time, in the manner, and by the officers prescribed by law for special elections in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22232.

If the canvass is made by an officer other than the board of supervisors of the affected county, the officer shall transmit the results to the board of supervisors. The board of supervisors shall declare the result of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Establishment of District [22256. - 22259.]

22256.

By a resolution entered on its minutes, the board of supervisors of each affected county shall declare the district formed if:

(a) A majority of the votes cast at the election is for the formation of the district.

(b) A majority of the votes cast in a majority in number of the cities included in whole or in part in the district, counting all of the unincorporated territory in each affected county as a city for this purpose, is for the formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22257.

The resolution shall contain the name of the district and a description or other designation of its boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22258.

A certified copy of the resolution shall be recorded in the office of the recorder of each affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22259.

Upon the filing with the Secretary of State, the formation of the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization [22401. - 22443.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [22401. - 22411.]

22401.

A board of five directors is the governing body of the district. Each director shall be a resident of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 398.)
-------------------------------------------

22402.

Each district shall hold a general district election, governed by the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law, for the election of directors on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

22403.

Within 30 days after notice of election or appointment each member of the board shall qualify by taking the official oath of office and filing it with the clerk of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22404.

The terms of office of the directors elected at the formation election are governed by the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

22406.

The board shall fill any vacancies occurring in the office of director. The appointee shall hold office for the balance of the term and until his successor is elected and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22407.

(a) Each member of the board of directors shall receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each attendance at the meeting of the board held within the district, which amount shall be fixed from time to time by the board. A director shall not receive pay for more than six meetings in any calendar month. The board of directors shall, commencing January 1, 2019, if the district compensates its members for more than four meetings per calendar month, adopt a written policy, based on a finding supported by substantial evidence, why more than four meetings per month are necessary for the effective operation of the district.
 The board of directors, by ordinance adopted pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20200) of Division 10 of the Water Code, may increase the amount of compensation received for attending meetings of the board by no more than 5 percent annually.

 (b) Each director shall be allowed, with the approval of the board, all traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred by the member in the performance of the member’s duties. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 170, Sec. 6.   (AB 2329)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22408.

The board shall hold its first meeting in the meeting room of the board of supervisors of the principal county at 10 a.m. on the first Monday after the formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22409.

At its first meeting the board shall provide for the time and place of holding its meetings and the manner in which special meetings may be called. The board may establish rules for its proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22410.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22411.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Officers and Employees [22436. - 22443.]

22436.

At its first meeting the board shall choose one of its members president. The president shall sign all contracts on behalf of the district and perform such other duties as may be imposed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22437.

At its first meeting or as soon thereafter as practicable, by a majority vote the board shall appoint a general manager, a secretary, a district counsel, and an auditor. These officers shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The board shall fix their compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22438.

The secretary shall countersign all contracts on behalf of the district and perform such other duties as may be imposed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22439.

The general manager has the following powers and functions:

(a) Full charge and control of the construction, maintenance, and operation of the physical properties of the district.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, full power to employ and discharge all employees and assistants at pleasure, prescribe their duties, and, subject to the approval of the board, to fix their compensation.

(c) Such other duties as may be imposed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22440.

The general manager shall report to the board in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22441.

The auditor shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting which shall competently and at all times show the financial condition of the district. He shall draw warrants to pay demands made against the district if the demands have been approved by at least three directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 760.)
-------------------------------------------

22442.

The board shall designate depositories for the custody of the funds of the district. A depository shall give security sufficient to secure the district against possible loss and shall pay the warrants drawn by the auditor for demands against the district under such rules as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22443.

The general manager, secretary, auditor, and all other employees or assistants of the district who may be required to do so by the board, shall give bonds to the district conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Powers and Duties [22551. - 22559.]

22551.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, the powers of the district shall be exercised by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22552.

A district has perpetual succession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22553.

A district may do all of the following:

(a) Sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(c) Provide and maintain public airports, spaceports, and landing places for aerial and space reentry traffic.

(d) Acquire by purchase, condemnation, donation, lease, or otherwise, real or personal property necessary to the full or convenient exercise of any of its powers or purposes.

(e) Improve, construct or reconstruct, lease, furnish or refurnish, use, repair, maintain, control, sell, or dispose of the property of the district, including any buildings, structures, lighting equipment, and all other equipment and facilities necessary for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 191, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22553.5.

(a) The board of directors may, from time to time, cause to be sold or leased property of the district which in its opinion is not needed for the district’s affairs.

(b) Such sales, at the discretion of the board of directors, may be on time, provided at least 20 percent of the total consideration be paid in cash at the time of the transaction and the remainder thereto be paid within 10 years and evidenced by a promissory note payable to the order of the district bearing interest at the rate of at least 5 percent per annum secured by a first mortgage, first deed of trust, or other prior encumbrance upon the property being sold.

(c) Property may be leased for any purpose and to any party whenever the board of directors finds that such lease does not interfere with use of such property for the purposes of the district or with the operations of the district. All rents and other consideration received by the district shall be paid into its general fund for the use of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 449.)
-------------------------------------------

22554.

A district may also:

(a) Employ legal counsel, in addition to its district counsel, and provide all necessary custodians, employees, engineers, and attendants for the proper maintenance of the property of the district and the conduct of the affairs of the district, for any of its purposes.

(b) Borrow money, incur indebtedness, issue bonds or other evidence of the indebtedness, and refund or retire any indebtedness of the district.

(c) Cause to be levied and collected, taxes for the purpose of maintaining and carrying on the operations of the district and paying its obligations.

(d) Make contracts, employ labor, and do all acts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of any of the powers of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 760.)
-------------------------------------------

22555.

The board shall make all rules governing the use of the airports and spaceports, landing places for aerial traffic, and other aerial facilities of the district that the board determines to be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 191, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22556.

The board may charge and collect fees, tolls, and rentals for the use of all or a part of the aerial facilities of the district in such amounts and at such rates as, so far as possible, will produce revenues sufficient to pay the operating expenses of the district, provide for repairs and depreciation of the properties of the district, pay the interest on the bonded indebtedness of the district, and provide a sinking or other fund for the payment of the principal of the indebtedness as it becomes due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22557.

(a) The district may issue temporary negotiable notes bearing interest at a rate not exceeding 8 percent per annum. However, these notes shall be general obligations of the district payable from revenues and taxes, unless paid from other available funds of the district, in the same manner as bonds of the district. The maturity of the notes shall not be later than 20 years from the date thereof, and the total aggregate amount of the notes outstanding at any one time shall not exceed 2 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district, or if the assessed valuation is not obtained, 2 percent of the county auditor’s estimate of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the district evidenced by his or her certificate. The total aggregate amount of these notes outstanding at any one time shall further not exceed the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(b) Any note proposed to be issued pursuant to subdivision (a) with a term longer than five years shall not be issued until after a public hearing is conducted with respect to the issuance and a resolution is adopted approving the issuance. At least 15 days prior to the public hearing, the board shall cause notice of the hearing to be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in the principal county. The resolution shall be subject to referendum pursuant to Section 9340 of the Elections Code and shall so provide. Within 15 days after adoption of the resolution of issuance, the board shall cause the resolution to be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county, or if there is none, posted in at least three public places in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 189.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

22557.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22557, the Big Bear Airport District may issue temporary negotiable notes bearing interest at a rate not exceeding the maximum rate permitted pursuant to Section 53531 of the Government Code. These notes shall be general obligations of the district payable from revenues and taxes, unless paid from other available funds of the district, in the same manner as bonds of the district. The notes shall mature not later than 20 years from the date thereof, and the total aggregate amount of notes outstanding at any one time shall not exceed 2 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district, or if the assessed valuation is not obtained, 2 percent of the county auditor’s estimate of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the district evidenced by the auditor’s certificate. The total aggregate amount of notes outstanding at any one time shall further not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).

(b) Any note proposed to be issued pursuant to subdivision (a) with a term longer than five years shall not be issued until after a public hearing is conducted with respect to the issuance and a resolution is adopted approving the issuance. At least 15 days prior to the public hearing, the board shall cause notice of the hearing to be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in the principal county. The resolution is subject to referendum pursuant to Section 9340 of the Elections Code and shall so provide. Within 15 days after adoption of the resolution of issuance, the board shall cause the resolution to be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county, or if there is none, posted in at least three public places in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 190.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

22558.

In addition to all other powers authorized by this part, the Santa Maria Public Airport District may do both of the following:

(a) Employ airport police officers in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 830.33 of the Penal Code.

(b) Pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, apply for, establish, operate, and maintain a foreign trade zone and subzones thereto, and allow in the foreign trade zone and the subzones thereto any properties and businesses that are located either within or outside the geographic boundaries of the district and that are located within either the County of Santa Barbara or the County of San Luis Obispo.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 396, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22559.

The board may by resolution change the name of the district. Certified copies of such resolution shall be recorded in each county within which some portion of the territory of the district is situated and shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State and to the clerk of each such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 398.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Claims [22601. - 22601.]

22601.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Bonds [22701. - 22851.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [22701. - 22708.]

22701.

As used in this chapter, “board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22702.

District bonds may be issued and sold pursuant to this chapter for all of the following purposes:

(a) Raising money for purchasing real property for airport and spaceport purposes.

(b) Building and purchasing buildings or structures including hangars, or making alterations, additions, or repairs to the buildings or structures.

(c) Restoring or rebuilding buildings or structures damaged or destroyed by fire or other public calamity.

(d) Supplying buildings, structures, and hangars with furnishings and necessary apparatus.

(e) Improving the grounds of airports and spaceports.

(f) Acquiring and maintaining lighting equipment and all other equipment, devices, and facilities necessary or convenient for the airports and spaceports.

(g) Liquidating any indebtedness incurred for these purposes or refunding any valid outstanding indebtedness of the district evidenced by bonds or warrant.

(h) Paying all costs and expenses incident to the bond election, including engineering, architectural, legal charges, fiscal agent’s charges and interest during construction and for a period of not to exceed 12 months after the date of completion of construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 191, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22703.

If the board deems it advisable it may call an election and submit to the electors of the district the question whether district bonds shall be issued and sold. The board shall call a bond election upon the filing with the board of a petition signed by 10 percent of the registered voters of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22704.

The board shall call and conduct the bond election in the manner prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22705.

The order calling the bond election shall be signed by a majority of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22706.

In the order calling the bond election, the board may submit to the electors as one proposal the question of issuing bonds for all or any of the purposes described in this article, or it may submit as separate questions the issuance of bonds for any of these purposes, singly or in such combinations as it directs in the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22707.

When bonds issued pursuant to this part have been investigated and certified by any authorized officer of the state and are declared to be legal investments for savings banks, they may be purchased or received in pledge for loans by savings banks, building and loan companies, trust companies, insurance companies, guardians, conservators, executors, administrators, and special administrators, or by any public officer of the state or of any county or other municipal or corporate body in the state having or holding funds which they may legally invest or loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

22708.

If any officer whose signature, countersignature, or attestation appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature, countersignature, or attestation is valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds. The signature on the coupons of the person who is auditor at the date of the bonds is valid although the bonds may be attested by a different person who is auditor at the time of their delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Bond Election [22731. - 22750.]

22731.

A notice of the bond election, signed by a majority of the directors, shall be posted in three public places in the district not less than 20 days before the election and shall be published in each affected county pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

22732.

The notice shall contain:

(a) The time and place of holding the bond election.

(b) The names of the election officers.

(c) The hours the polls will be open.

(d) A statement of the purpose for which the election is held.

(e) The amount and denomination, the rate of interest, and the term, not exceeding 40 years, of the proposed bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22733.

For the purpose of the bond election, the board may divide the district into election precincts and may change the precincts as often as occasion requires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22734.

The board shall appoint one inspector, one judge, and two clerks of election in each precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22735.

If the board fails to appoint the election officers, or if those appointed are not present at the opening of the polls, the electors present may appoint them and they shall conduct the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22736.

The board may fix the compensation of the election officers but not exceeding seven dollars ($7) for each election officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22737.

The polls shall be open on election day from 8 a.m. until 8 p.m.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22738.

Every resident of the district, who is a qualified elector of the county, and who is registered in the precinct where the election is held at least 30 days before the election, may vote in the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22739.

The secretary shall obtain uniform ballots for the bond election. No other form of ballot shall be used. The expense of printing and distributing the ballots to the polling places shall be paid as other current expenses of the district are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22740.

The ballot shall contain the following:

(a) “Official ballot provided by the board of directors of the ‛____ airport district’ to be used in the bond election of said district in the county of ____, State of California, on the ____ day of ____ 20__.”

(b) Other matters required by law.

(c) To the right of or below the bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 29.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22741.

The board shall provide a booth or private room in which the voter may prepare his ballot in secret.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22742.

No electioneering shall be carried on within 100 feet of the polls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22743.

Each voter shall completely select the voting target next to either “Yes” or “No” respectively, to indicate whether the voter has voted for or against the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 30.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22744.

After marking his ballot the voter shall hand it to the inspector. The inspector, in the presence of the voter, shall deposit the ballot in the ballot box. The judge or clerks shall enter the voter’s name on the poll list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22745.

Any person offering to vote may be challenged by any elector of the district. In the case of a challenge the judge or clerks of the election shall administer to the person challenged an oath substantially as follows: “You do swear that you are a citizen of the United States, that you are 21 years of age, that you have resided in this State one year, in this county 90 days, and in this airport district 30 days preceding this election, and that your name is on the great register of this county and was on the great register of a precinct in this airport district at least 30 days before this election, and that you have not before voted this day.” If the person challenged takes this oath his vote shall be received. Otherwise his vote shall be rejected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22746.

The secretary shall provide the election officers with official poll and tally lists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22747.

The heading of the poll list shall read “Official poll list of ____ airport district for the airport district bond election on the ____ day of ____ 19__.” Under this heading shall be arranged three columns. The heading of the first column shall read “Write your name as it appears on the great register of this county.” The heading of the second column shall read “Write your residence, street and number, city, and airport district.” The heading of the third column shall read “Are you a qualified registered voter in this airport district?” The person offering to vote shall write his name on the first column of the poll list, give his residence in the second, and in the third shall write the word “Yes” or “No.” If he writes the word “No” he shall not be permitted to vote. Persons writing the word “Yes” may be challenged pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22748.

The heading of the tally list shall read “An official tally list of ____ airport district for the airport district bond election held on the ____ day of ____ 19__.” It shall be arranged so that the propositions to be voted on at the election may be set forth. It shall be vertically ruled to provide for the counting of votes under a tally system. The heading of the final column shall read “Total votes cast for the bonds” and “Total votes cast against the bonds.” A space shall be provided at the bottom of the page for the signatures of the election officers. Over these signatures shall be printed the words “We hereby certify that this is a correct report of the election held in ____ airport district in the county of ____ on the ____ day of ____ 19__.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22749.

The election officers shall publicly canvass the votes immediately after closing the polls. They shall fill out the tally sheet and certify the correctness of the canvass. They shall make, sign, and deliver a certificate of the result of the election and transmit it to the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22750.

The election officers shall transmit the returns of the election to the board of directors. The board shall meet and canvass the returns on the seventh day after the election at 2 p.m.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bond Issuance [22776. - 22786.]

22776.

If two-thirds of the votes cast at the election were for the issuance of bonds, the board shall enter that fact in its minutes. The board shall certify all of the board proceedings to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22777.

The board of supervisors shall issue the district bonds in the number and amount specified in the bond proceedings. The board of supervisors shall provide that the bonds are payable out of the interest and sinking fund of the district, naming the fund, and that the money for redemption of the bonds and payment of the interest shall be raised by taxation upon the taxable property in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22778.

By an order entered in its minutes, the board of supervisors shall:

(a) Prescribe the form of the bonds and of the interest coupons.

(b) The manner in which the bonds shall be executed.

(c) Fix the time when all or any part of the principal of the bonds is payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22779.

The total amount of bonds issued shall not exceed 15 percent of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment books of the affected counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22780.

The term of the bonds shall not exceed 40 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22781.

The bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States as to principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22782.

The board of supervisors may make the principal and interest of the bonds payable at the office of the treasurer of the principal county, at such other place within the United States as the board may designate, or at the county treasurer’s office or such other designated place at the option of the bondholders. The place of payment shall be specified in the bonds. The expense of paying the principal and interest other than at the office of the county is a charge against the district funds, to be paid out of the tax for the payment of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22783.
